incubator/apertium-la-es/apertium-la-es.la.dix
          <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vantur</l>
          <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="psv"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ctu</l>
          <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="spn"/><s n="dat"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ctum</l>
          <r>vere<s n="vblex"/><s n="spn"/><s n="acc"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="abu/ti__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tar</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>temur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teris</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>temini</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tetur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tentur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>titor</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>titor</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tuntor</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tere</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>timini</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ti</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebar</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebamur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebaris</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebamini</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebatur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tebantur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>terer</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teremur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tereris</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teremini</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teretur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>terentur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tor</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>timur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>teris</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>timini</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>titur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tuntur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tar</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tamur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>taris</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tamini</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tatur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>tantur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ten</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amans"/>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sur</l>
          <r>ti<s n="vblex"/><s n="pfut"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="BASE__amatus"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="abuti"><i>abu</i><par n="abu/ti__vblex"/></e>
